California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 29.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41963.

No allowance of severance aid shall be made as provided in Section 41960 unless the total assessed value of taxable real property within the school district is reduced by one-half of one (0.5) percent or more during a fiscal year by reason of acquisitions giving rise to severance aid as provided in Section 41960. In determining whether or not the value of the acquisitions is equal to one-half of one (0.5) percent or more of the value of taxable real property, all of these acquisitions made during each fiscal year shall be considered as one sum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41964.

On or before each May 25th, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall determine and certify to the Controller the amount of severance aid computed and to be allowed to school districts under Section 41960 for the fiscal year. On or before each June 15th, the Controller shall order the transfer, from the Motor Vehicle Transportation Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund to the State School Fund, of the amount of severance aid computed and to be allowed to school districts for the fiscal year as so certified, and the amount so computed and certified is hereby appropriated for purposes of the transfer. The Department of Transportation may charge or allocate to the appropriate particular projects on account of which severance aid was computed, the amounts so transferred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Recomputation of Allowances [41970. - 41972.]

41970.

The total amount apportioned from Section A of the State School Fund shall not exceed the amount provided by law therefor. If the total amount provided for Section A of the State School Fund is greater than the total apportioned, the balance from any specified expenditure authorization in Sections 41300 and 41301 shall be used to decrease deficits in apportionments from Section A of the State School Fund in the order prescribed in Section 41972.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41971.

If the total amount allowed for each subdivision in Sections 41300 and 41301 is less than the apportionments named in the subsections, the apportionments shall be reduced proportionately or as otherwise prescribed. Prior to the close of the fiscal year, such reductions shall be restored to the extent possible pursuant to Section 41970.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41972.

Balances available from any appropriation for apportionments from Section A of the State School Fund and funds provided by subdivision (c) of Section 14002, or provided by any other provision of law in lieu of those sections, shall be used to restore any reductions in apportionments to elementary, high, and unified school districts and county superintendents of schools as follows:

(a) First, for revenue limits computed pursuant to Sections 2558 and 42238. 

(b) Second, for special education computed pursuant to Chapter 7.2 (commencing with Section 56836) of Part 30.

(c) Third, for home-to-school transportation computed pursuant to Section 41856 or, commencing with the 1984–85 fiscal year, Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 8. 

Any remaining balances otherwise transferable under subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 14002 shall revert to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 12.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.3. Conditions on Apportionments and Allowances [41975. - 41976.1.]

41975.

(a) Apportionments and allowances to a school district from Section A of the State School Fund in a fiscal year may not be less than the product of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) multiplied by the average daily attendance of the district in the preceding fiscal year, or two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400), whichever amount is the greater.

(b) State funds apportioned to each school district for categorical education programs, or other state funds apportioned to each school district from the State School Fund, shall be applied to meet the requirement of Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution to provide a minimum of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) of state aid per pupil or two thousand four hundred
 dollars ($2,400) per school district.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may not increase the local control funding formula apportionment of any school district pursuant to Section 42238.02 or 42238.03, as applicable, to provide basic state aid pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution or any other law, unless that school district has not received the greater amount of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per pupil or two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400) from all state funds, including funds for categorical education programs. If a school district receives less than the amount specified in this subdivision, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate the difference between the amount of state funds received and the constitutional minimum of the greater amount of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) per pupil or two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400) per school
 district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 18.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

41976.

For purposes of this chapter, the following classes and courses are authorized to be offered by school districts and county superintendents of schools for the Adult Education Program, established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3, apportionment purposes from the adult education fund:

(a) Programs for adults in elementary and secondary basic skills, including programs leading to a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate.

(b) Programs for adult immigrants who are eligible for educational services in citizenship, English as a second language, immigrant integration, and workforce preparation.

(c) Programs for adults, including, but not limited to, older adults, that are primarily related to entry or reentry into the workforce.

(d) Programs for adults, including, but not limited to, older adults, that are primarily designed to develop knowledge and skills to assist and support elementary and secondary school pupils to succeed academically in school.

(e) Programs for adults with disabilities.

(f) Programs for adults in career technical education that are short term in nature and have high employment potential.

(g) Programs for adults offering preapprenticeship training activities conducted in coordination with one or more apprenticeship programs approved by the Division of
 Apprenticeship Standards for the occupation and geographic area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 30.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41976.1.

Notwithstanding Section 41976, any school district may offer adult education courses and classes in the adult education programs described in Section 41976 provided that district qualifies for funding to begin those courses or classes pursuant to Section 52616.18.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1193, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.4. Designation of Joint Powers Entities as Single School Districts [41980. - 41983.]

41980.

(a) Any separate joint powers entity formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code that has as its sole function the provision of school transportation services may, subject to prior approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, be designated a single school district for purposes of receiving state apportionments or allowances in support of those services or programs. Those school transportation apportionments or allowances shall be allocated to a separate joint powers entity under this section in any fiscal year only to the extent that the governing board of the school district or districts that would otherwise receive those state apportionments or allowances expressly approves that allocation under a resolution adopted on or before June 30 preceding that fiscal year.

(b) Any separate joint powers entity formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code that has as its sole function the provision of school food services may, subject to prior approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, be designated a single school district for purposes of receiving state apportionments or allowances in support of those services or programs. Those school food apportionments or allowances shall be allocated to a separate joint powers entity under this section in any fiscal year only to the extent that the governing board of the school district or districts that would otherwise receive those state apportionments or allowances expressly approves that allocation under a resolution adopted on or before June 30 preceding that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1414, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41981.

For purposes of this chapter, and notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6505.5 of the Government Code, the fiscal officer of the joint powers entity shall be the county superintendent of schools. If the joint powers entity is situated partly within two or more counties, in terms of its participating school districts, the fiscal officer shall be the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the greatest area of the joint powers entity lies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 824, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41982.

The joint powers entity shall be subject to the same budget, expenditure, appropriation, accounting, auditing, and program requirements as school districts and county superintendents of schools generally with respect to school transportation programs and food services programs. Employees of the Newhall School District, the William S. Hart Union High School District, the Sulphur Springs Union School District, the Saugus Union School District, or the Castaic Union School District who become employees of a joint powers entity that has as its sole function the provision of school food services, pursuant to the participation of their respective schools in the joint powers entity, shall be entitled to carry over their seniority upon transfer to the joint powers entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1414, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

41983.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may adopt regulations for the implementation of this chapter, including, but not limited to, standards and requirements relating to applications, approvals, reports, apportionments, and allowances, and changes in membership of the joint powers entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 824, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Financial Statements of School Districts [42100. - 42142.]



  ARTICLE 1. Statements [42100. - 42105.]

42100.

(a) On or before September 15, the governing board of each school district shall approve, in a format prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, an annual statement of all receipts and expenditures of the district for the preceding fiscal year and shall file the statement, along with the statement received pursuant to subdivision (b), with the county superintendent of schools. On or before October 15, the county superintendent of schools shall verify the mathematical accuracy of the statements and shall transmit a copy to the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(b) On or before September 15, each charter school shall approve, in a format prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, an annual statement of all receipts and expenditures of the charter school for the preceding fiscal year and shall file the statement with the entity that approved the charter school.

(c) The forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be adopted as regulations by the State Board of Education, and may be amended periodically to accommodate changes in statute or government reporting standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1058, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

42103.

(a) The governing board of each school district shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget in a school district facility, or some other place conveniently accessible to the residents of the school district. The public hearing shall be held any day on or before the date specified for this purpose in subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of, Section 42127, but not less than three working days following availability of the proposed budget for public inspection. At the hearing, any resident in the school district may appear and object to the proposed budget or any item in the budget.

(b) The public hearing required by this section may be concluded on the proposed budget when there are no requests for further hearing on file, and shall be
 concluded no later than the date specified for this purpose in subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of, Section 42127. The budget shall not be finally adopted by the governing board of the school district until after the public hearing has been held.

(c) The proposed budget shall show expenditures, cash balances, and all revenues, as required to be tabulated pursuant to Sections 42122 and 42123, and also shall include an estimate of those figures, unaudited, for the preceding fiscal year. In addition, any tax statement submitted by the governing board of the school district pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42127, any school district tax requirement computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42127 for the school year to which the proposed budget is intended to apply, and any recommendations made by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42127 shall be made available by the school
 district for public inspection in a facility of the school district or in some other place conveniently accessible to residents of the school district.

(d) (1) (A) Notification of the dates and location or locations at which the proposed budget may be inspected by the public, and the date, time, and location of the public hearing on the proposed budget, shall be published by the school district or the county superintendent of schools on behalf of the school district, in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district or, if there is no newspaper of general circulation in the school district, in any newspaper of general circulation in the county, at least three days before the availability of the proposed budget for public inspection.

(B) The publication of the dates and locations pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall occur no
 earlier than 45 days before the final date for the hearing as specified in subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of, Section 42127, but not less than 10 days before the date set for hearing. The cost of the publication shall be a legal and proper charge against the school district for which the publication is made.

(2) A school district may also post the notice described in paragraph (1) on the school district’s internet website.

(3) Each county superintendent of schools shall verify that the publishing requirement described in paragraph (1) is met for all school districts in their jurisdiction.

(e) (1) The department shall select three school districts that agree to provide information to the department regarding how the school district communicates with the school community within the school district. The department shall select school districts from the northern, southern, and central regions of the state and from urban, rural, and suburban areas, so that the school districts are broadly representative of the geographic diversity of the state.

(2) (A) A participating school district shall provide all of the following information to the department:

(i) How the school community receives or accesses information from the school district.

(ii) The types of information posted on the school
 district’s internet website.

(iii) The effectiveness of information posted on the school district’s internet website for communicating with the school community.

(iv) Other methods by which the school district communicates with the school community aside from posting information on the school district’s internet website and the effectiveness of those other methods.

(v) Recommendations for how the school district can improve communication with the school community.

(vi) Any other information the department requests relating to how the school district communicates with the school community within the school district.

(B) A participating school district shall solicit feedback from the larger
 school community, including, but not limited to, the parents and guardians of pupils enrolled in the school district, for purposes of this subdivision.

(3) A participating school district shall provide the information described in paragraph (2) to the department on or before December 31, 2024, on or before December 31, 2025, and on or before December 31, 2026.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 811, Sec. 1.   (AB 721)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 811.)
-------------------------------------------

42103.

(a) The governing board of each school district shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget in a school district facility, or some other place conveniently accessible to the residents of the school district. The public hearing shall be held any day on or before the date specified for this purpose in subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of, Section 42127, but not less than three working days following availability of the proposed budget for public inspection. At the hearing, any resident in the school district may appear and object to the proposed budget or any item in the budget.

(b) The public hearing required by this section may be concluded on the proposed budget when there are no requests for further hearing on file,
 and shall be concluded no later than the date specified for this purpose in subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of, Section 42127. The budget shall not be finally adopted by the governing board of the school district until after the public hearing has been held.

(c) The proposed budget shall show expenditures, cash balances, and all revenues, as required to be tabulated pursuant to Sections 42122 and 42123, and also shall include an estimate of those figures, unaudited, for the preceding fiscal year. In addition, any tax statement submitted by the governing board of the school district pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42127, any school district tax requirement computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42127 for the school year to which the proposed budget is intended to apply, and any recommendations made by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42127 shall be made available
 by the school district for public inspection in a facility of the school district or in some other place conveniently accessible to residents of the school district.

(d) (1) (A) Notification of the dates and location or locations at which the proposed budget may be inspected by the public, and the date, time, and location of the public hearing on the proposed budget, shall be posted prominently on the homepage of the internet website of the school district at least three days before the availability of the proposed budget for public inspection.

(B) The posting of the dates and locations pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall occur no earlier than 45 days before the final date for the hearing as specified in subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of, Section 42127, but not less than 10 days before the date set for
 hearing.

(2) The notice described in paragraph (1) may also be published by the school district, or the county superintendent of schools on behalf of the school district, in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district or in any newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(3) Each county superintendent of schools shall verify that the posting requirement described in paragraph (1) is met for all school districts in their jurisdiction.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 811, Sec. 2.   (AB 721)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42104.

Any violation of this article or a failure to comply with its provisions by the county superintendent of schools or by the governing board of any school district is punishable under Section 1222 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42105.

The governing board of any school district may print and distribute in pamphlet form an annual financial statement of the receipts and expenditures of the school district, and may include in the pamphlet a general report concerning the conduct and condition of the schools of the district. Similar information of value to the public regarding the school system may be printed and distributed from time to time, or published not oftener than once a year, in a newspaper of general circulation published within the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Budget Requirements [42122. - 42129.]

42122.

Effective July 1, 1988, each budget shall show a complete plan and itemized statement of all proposed expenditures of the school district and of all estimated revenues for the ensuing fiscal year, together with a comparison of revenues and expenditures for the existing fiscal year. The budget shall also include the appropriations limit and the total annual appropriations subject to limitation as determined pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 7900) of Title 1 of the Government Code. The county superintendent of schools shall from his or her own records supply to the school district any information that the school district may need to make the comparisons required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1025, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

42123.

Each budget shall be itemized to set forth the necessary revenues and expenditures in each fund to operate the public schools of the district as authorized by law and on forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1150, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

42124.

The budget may also contain an amount to be known as the general reserve in such sum as the governing board may deem sufficient, for the next succeeding fiscal year, to meet the cash requirements to which the district’s credit may be legally extended for that portion of said next succeeding fiscal year until adequate proceeds of the taxes levied for, or apportionment of state funds made to, the district during such succeeding fiscal year are available to the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42125.

The budget may contain amounts to be known as the designated fund balance, which may be designated for any specific purpose as determined by the governing board of the school district, and the unappropriated fund balance. These funds shall be available for appropriation by a majority vote of the members of the governing board, to cover expenditures that have not been provided for or that may have been insufficiently provided for, or for unforeseen requirements as they may arise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

42126.

Effective July 1, 1988, each budget shall be made on the number of forms and upon the blanks or in the format prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. It shall be the duty of the Superintendent of Public Instruction to prepare standard forms or a format necessary to show the budgeting items and comparisons required by this article. The required forms or format shall be furnished to the school districts by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.

(a) On or before July 1 of each year, the governing board of each school district shall accomplish the following:

(1) Hold a public hearing conducted in accordance with Section 42103 on the budget to be adopted for the subsequent fiscal year. The budget to be adopted shall be prepared in accordance with Section 42126. The agenda for that hearing shall be posted at least 72 hours before the public hearing and shall include the location where the budget will be available for public inspection.

(2) (A) Adopt a budget. Not later than five days after that adoption or by July 1, whichever occurs first, the governing
 board of the school district shall file that budget with the county
 superintendent of schools. The budget and supporting data shall be maintained and made available for public review. If the governing board of the school district does not want all or a portion of the property tax requirement levied for the purpose of making payments for the interest and redemption charges on indebtedness as described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, the budget shall include a statement of the amount or portion for which a levy shall not be made. For the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the governing board of the school district shall not adopt a budget before the governing board of the school district adopts a local control and accountability plan, if an existing local control and accountability plan or annual update to a local control and accountability
 plan is not effective for the budget year. The governing board of a school district shall not adopt a budget that does not include the expenditures necessary to implement the local control and accountability plan or the annual update to a local control and accountability plan that is effective for the budget year.

(B) Commencing with budgets adopted for the 2015–16 fiscal year, the governing board of a school district that proposes to adopt a budget that includes a combined assigned and unassigned ending fund balance in excess of the minimum recommended reserve for economic uncertainties adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 33128, shall, at the public hearing held pursuant to paragraph (1), provide all of the following for public review and discussion:

(i) The minimum recommended reserve for economic uncertainties for each fiscal year identified in the budget.

(ii) The combined assigned and unassigned ending fund balances that are in excess of the minimum recommended reserve for economic uncertainties for each fiscal year identified in the budget.

(iii) A statement of reasons that substantiates the need for an assigned and unassigned ending fund balance that is in excess of the minimum recommended reserve for economic uncertainties for each fiscal year that the school district identifies an assigned and unassigned ending fund balance that is in excess of the minimum recommended reserve for economic uncertainties, as identified pursuant to clause (ii).

(C) The governing board of a school district shall include the information required pursuant to subparagraph (B) in its budgetary submission each time it files an adopted or revised budget with the county superintendent of schools. The information required pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall be maintained and made available for public review.

(b) The county superintendent of schools may accept changes in any statement included in the budget, pursuant to subdivision (a), of the amount or portion for which a property tax levy shall not be made. The county superintendent of schools or the county auditor shall compute the actual amounts to be levied on the property tax rolls of the school district for purposes that exceed apportionments to the school district pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division
 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Each school district shall provide all data needed by the county superintendent of schools or the county auditor to compute the amounts. On or before August 15, the county superintendent of schools shall transmit the amounts computed to the county auditor who shall compute the tax rates necessary to produce the amounts. On or before September 1, the county auditor shall submit the rate computed to the board of
 supervisors for adoption.

(c) The county superintendent of schools shall do all of the following:

(1) Examine the adopted budget to determine whether it complies with the standards and criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127 for application to final local educational agency budgets. The county superintendent of schools shall identify, if necessary, technical corrections that are required to be made to bring the budget into compliance with those standards and criteria.

(2) Determine whether the adopted budget will allow the school district to meet its financial obligations during the fiscal year and is consistent with a financial plan that will enable the school district to
 satisfy its multiyear financial commitments. In addition to
 the county superintendent of schools’ own analysis of the budget of each school district, the county superintendent of schools shall review and consider studies, reports, evaluations, or audits of the school district that were commissioned by the school district, the county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent, and state control agencies and that contain evidence that the school district is showing fiscal distress under the standards and criteria adopted in Section 33127 or that contain a finding by an external reviewer that the school district is at moderate or high risk of intervention based on the most common
 indicators of a school district needing intervention, as determined by the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team. The county superintendent of schools shall either conditionally approve or disapprove a budget that does not provide adequate assurance that the school district will meet its current and future obligations and resolve any problems identified in studies, reports, evaluations, or audits described in this paragraph.

(3) Determine whether the adopted budget includes the expenditures necessary to implement the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan approved by the county superintendent of schools.

(4) Determine whether the adopted budget includes a combined assigned
 and unassigned ending fund balance that exceeds the minimum recommended reserve for economic uncertainties. If the adopted budget includes a combined assigned and unassigned ending fund balance that exceeds the minimum recommended reserve for economic uncertainties, the county superintendent of schools shall verify that the school district complied with the requirements of subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) (1) On or before September 15, the county superintendent of schools shall approve, conditionally approve, or disapprove the adopted budget for each school district. For the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the county superintendent of schools shall disapprove a budget if the county superintendent of schools determines that the budget does not include the expenditures
 necessary to implement a local control and accountability plan or an annual update to the local control and accountability plan approved by the county superintendent of schools. If the governing board of a school district does not submit a budget to the county superintendent of schools, the county superintendent of schools shall develop, at school district expense, a budget for that school district by September 15 and transmit that budget to the governing board of the school district. The budget prepared by the county superintendent of schools shall be deemed adopted, unless the county superintendent of schools approves any modifications made by the governing board of the school district. The budget prepared by the county superintendent of schools shall also comply with the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The approved budget shall be used as a guide for the
 school district’s priorities. The Superintendent shall review and certify the budget approved by the county. If, pursuant to the review conducted pursuant to subdivision (c), the county superintendent of schools determines that the adopted budget for a school district does not satisfy that subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall conditionally approve or disapprove the budget and, not later than September 15, transmit to the governing board of the school district, in writing,
 the county superintendent of schools’ recommendations regarding revision of the budget and the reasons for those recommendations, including, but not limited to, the amounts of any budget adjustments needed before the county superintendent of schools can approve that budget. The county superintendent of schools may assign a fiscal adviser to assist the school district to develop a budget in compliance with those revisions. In addition, the county superintendent of schools may appoint a committee to examine and comment on the county superintendent’s review and recommendations, subject to the requirement that the committee report its findings to the county superintendent of schools no later than September 20.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter,
 the budget shall not be adopted or approved by the county superintendent of schools before a local control and accountability plan or update to an existing local control and accountability plan for the budget year is approved.

(3) If the adopted budget of a school district is conditionally approved or disapproved pursuant to paragraph (1), on or before October 8, the governing board of the school district, in conjunction with the county superintendent of schools, shall review and respond to the recommendations of the county superintendent of schools at a regular meeting of the governing board of the school district. The response shall include any revisions to the adopted budget and other proposed actions to be taken, if any, as a result of those recommendations.

(e) On
 or before October 22, the county superintendent of schools shall provide a list to the Superintendent identifying all school districts for which budgets may be disapproved.

(f) (1) The county superintendent of schools shall examine the revised budget as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) to determine whether it (A) complies with the standards and criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 33127 for application to final local educational agency budgets, (B) allows the school district to meet its financial obligations during the fiscal year, (C) satisfies all conditions established by the county superintendent of schools in the case of a conditionally approved budget, (D) is consistent with a financial plan that will enable the school district to satisfy its multiyear financial commitments, and, not
 later than November 8, shall approve or disapprove the revised budget, and (E) whether the revised budget complies with the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). If the county superintendent of schools disapproves the budget, the county superintendent of schools shall call for the formation of a budget review committee pursuant to Section 42127.1, unless the governing board of the school district and the county superintendent of schools agree to waive the requirement that a budget review committee be formed and the department approves the waiver after determining that a budget review committee is not necessary. Upon the grant of a waiver, the county superintendent of schools immediately has the authority and responsibility provided in Section 42127.3. Upon approving a waiver of the budget review committee, the department shall ensure that a balanced budget is adopted
 for the school district by December 31. If no budget is adopted by December 31, the Superintendent may adopt a budget for the school district. The Superintendent shall report to the Legislature and the Director of Finance by January 10 if any school district, including a school district that has received a waiver of the budget review committee process, does not have an adopted budget by December 31. This report shall include the reasons why a budget has not been adopted by the deadline, the steps being taken to finalize budget adoption, the date the adopted budget is anticipated, and whether the Superintendent has or will exercise the Superintendent’s
 authority to adopt a budget for the school district.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, if the county superintendent of schools disapproves the budget for the sole reason that the county superintendent of schools has not approved a local control and accountability plan or an annual update to the local control and accountability plan filed by the governing board of the school district pursuant to Section 52070, the county superintendent of schools shall not call for the formation of a budget review committee pursuant to Section 42127.1.

(g) Not later than November 8, the county superintendent of schools shall submit a report to the Superintendent identifying all school districts for which budgets have been
 disapproved, and whether a budget review committee will be formed or waived. The report shall include a copy of the written response transmitted to each of those school districts pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(h) Not later than 45 days after the Governor signs the annual Budget Act, the school district shall make available for public review any revisions in revenues and expenditures that it has made to its budget to reflect the funding made available by that Budget Act.

(i) Any school district for which the county board of education serves as the governing board of the school district is not subject to subdivisions (c) to (h), inclusive, but is governed instead by the budget procedures set forth in Section 1622.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 24.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42127.01.
